Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0014.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1290. (1) If a public school charges a fee for admission to an interscholastic athletic activity event offered by the public school at its high school, the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy that operates the school shall ensure that cash is an acceptable form of payment for the fee. (2) As used in this section, "high school" means a school that offers at least 1 of grades 9 to 12.